District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-402

Issuance of insurance policies by authorized company; bonds to be secured; reserves for losses, unearned premiums and other liabilities required; rules and regulations; conditions for cancellation of bonds and insurance policies.

Repealed.

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 2
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 952, Pub. L. 85-792,§ 2
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703
1981 Ed., § 44-302.
1973 Ed., § 44-302.